Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-321 Reinsurer's liability. The
amount recoverable by the liquidator from reinsurers shall not be reduced as a
result of delinquency proceedings, regardless of any provision in the
reinsurance contract or other agreement. Payment made directly to an insured
or other creditor shall not diminish the reinsurer's obligation to the
insurer's estate except when the reinsurance contract provided for direct
coverage of a named insured and the payment was made in discharge of that
obligation. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next